Utah statutes.
11-14-202.   Notice of election -- Contents -- Publication -- Mailing.
(1)  The governing body shall ensure that notice of the election is provided:
(a)  once per week during three consecutive weeks by publication in a
newspaper having general circulation in the local political subdivision in
accordance with Section 11-14-316, the first publication occurring not less
than 21 nor more than 35 days before the election;
(b)  on a website, if available, in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for the
three weeks that immediately precede the election; and
(c)  in a local political subdivision where there is no newspaper of general
circulation, by posting notice of the bond election in at least five public
places in the local political subdivision at least 21 days before the
election.
(2)  When the debt service on the bonds to be issued will increase the
property tax imposed upon the average value of a residence by an amount that
is greater than or equal to $15 per year, the governing body shall prepare and
mail a voter information pamphlet:
(a)  at least seven days but not more than 30 days before the bond election;
(b)  to each household containing a registered voter who is eligible to vote
on the bonds; and
(c)  that includes the information required by Subsections (3) and (4).
(3)  The notice and voter information pamphlet required by this section shall
include:
(a)  the date and place of the election;
(b)  the hours during which the polls will be open; and
(c)  the title and text of the ballot proposition.
(4)  The voter information pamphlet required by this section shall include:
(a)  the information required by Subsection (3); and
(b)  an explanation of the property tax impact, if any, of the issuance of the
bonds, which may be based on information the governing body determines to be
useful, including:
(i)  expected debt service on the bonds to be issued;
(ii)  a description of the purpose, remaining principal balance, and maturity
date of any outstanding general obligation bonds of the issuer;
(iii)  funds other than property taxes available to pay debt service on
general obligation bonds;
(iv)  timing of expenditures of bond proceeds;
(v)  property values; and
(vi)  any additional information that the governing body determines may be
useful to explain the property tax impact of issuance of the bonds.
(5)  The governing body shall pay the costs associated with the notice
required by this section.
